Tennessee, session 114, HB0222.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-17-912(e)(1), is amended by
deleting "including court costs and reasonable attorney fees" and substituting "including actual
damages; nominal damages; punitive damages, if applicable pursuant to § 29-39-104; court
costs; and reasonable attorney fees".
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-17-912(e), is amended by adding
the following as a new subdivision:
(3) An action under this section may be certified as a class action pursuant to
Rule 23 of the Tennessee Rules of Civil Procedure, if appropriate.
SECTION 3. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-17-912, is amended by deleting
subsection (h).
SECTION 4. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-17-902, is amended by adding
the following as a new subsection:
( ) In addition to any criminal penalties, a person or entity that violates
subsection (a) may be found civilly liable to an injured party for nominal damages; actual
damages; punitive damages, if applicable pursuant to § 29-39-104; court costs; and
reasonable attorney fees as ordered by the court.
HB0222
001254
- 1 -

SECTION 5. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-17-912(j), is amended by
designating the existing language as subdivision (j)(1) and adding the following new subdivision
(j)(2):
(2) The attorney general and reporter may issue guidance to assist commercial
entities in complying with this part.
SECTION 6. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
- 2 - 001254